Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB139.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949, is amended by adding a section to read:Section 1330.1. Exception from Compulsory Education for Certain Children with Disabilities.--(a) Beginning with the 2025-2026 school year, a parent or guardian of a child six (6) years of age who is required to attend school in this Commonwealth for the first time may submit to the department a request for a waiver from the requirements of compulsory attendance under this act for the child if all of the following requirements are met:1234567891011121314151617181920 (1) The child has been clinically diagnosed with autism spectrum disorder by a qualified medical professional.(2) The child has been assessed in the last six (6) months by a qualified medical professional and has been clinically recommended for continued intensive early intervention services based on the child's development and functional skill set.(3) The parent or guardian provides proof that early intervention services will be provided to the child for the term of the waiver.(b) Upon receipt of a waiver request under subsection (a), the department shall notify the school district of residence.(c) If the requirements of subsection (a) are met, the department shall approve the waiver for a period not to exceed one (1) year and send an approval letter to the parent or guardian and school district of residence.(d) The parent or guardian of a child whose request for a waiver has been approved by the department under subsection (c):(1) shall retain the right to enroll the child in the school district of residence at any time during the school year; and(2) is not eligible for compensatory education for time the child is not enrolled in the school district of residence during the waiver period.(e) During the waiver period, the child shall be considered an "eligible young child" under the act of December 19, 1990 (P.L.1372, No.212), known as the Early Intervention Services System Act, for the purposes of receiving early intervention services.(f) At the end of the waiver period, a parent or guardian may enroll the child in kindergarten or first grade for the next school year.20250SB0139PN0085 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (g) The department shall issue guidelines to implement this section within thirty (30) days of the effective date of this section.Section 2. This act shall take effect immediately.20250SB0139PN0085 - 3 - 1234